Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4007
Board; responsibility; powers.

The board shall be responsible
for the administration of all subsequent appointments and may adopt rules
and regulations to carry out such responsibility. The composition of the board as defined by section 2-4004
shall continue until such time as the board determines that the districts
and at-large membership as defined by such section are incompatible with an
equitable representation of producers of grain sorghum due to changing geographic
distribution of grain sorghum production in the state, changing marketing
patterns, or availability of qualified individuals to serve as board members.
The board may, from time to time as appropriate, by rule and regulation, redesignate
districts and the number of at-large members to provide for an equitable representation
of producers of grain sorghum, except that the number of appointed members
of the board shall be either seven or five and the number of districts shall
be no greater than six nor fewer than three.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB107, § 4.